Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201358-851
Act, how construed.

The Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance
Authority Act, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants,
shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 48;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2948;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 48;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1748;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 51.